Hawaii statutes.
[§371K-2] Office of community services,
establishment. (a) There is established within the department of labor
and industrial relations, for administrative purposes only, an office of
community services. The following shall be among the programs to be under the
auspices of and coordinated through the office:

(1) Progressive neighborhoods program;

(2) Hawaii office of economic opportunity;

(3) Refugee resettlement program; and

(4) State immigrant services center.

(b) The head of the office shall be known as
the executive director of the office of community services, hereinafter
referred to as executive director. The executive director shall have:
training and experience in the field of social work, education, public health,
or related fields; direct experience in programs and services related to
disadvantaged persons, refugees, or immigrants; and experience in a
supervisory, consultative, or administrative capacity. The executive director
shall be appointed by the governor without regard to chapter 76, and shall be
compensated at a salary level no less than that of a second deputy. The
executive director shall be included in any benefit program generally
applicable to the officers and employees of the State. [L 1985, c 305, pt of
§1; am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next